Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 2. Special Administrators

§ 961.
Special administrator; appointment when estate jeopardized; conduct of business.

When the interests of the estate of a deceased person will be jeopardized by the delay intervening between death and the appointment of an administrator or executor, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may, upon motion of an heir or next of kin, appoint a special administrator to act until an administrator or executor is appointed and qualified. The special administrator may continue operation of the business conducted by the deceased, including application for and operating under the transfer of any license held by the deceased for the dispensing of alcoholic beverages.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 50;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 962.
Appointment in case of delay.

When there is delay in granting letters testamentary or of administration, occasioned by an appeal from the allowance or disallowance of a will, or from other cause, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint a special administrator to act in collecting and taking charge of the estate of the deceased until the questions causing the delay are decided and an executor or administrator is appointed. An appeal shall not be allowed from the appointment of a special administrator.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 51;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 963.
Powers.

A special administrator shall collect the goods, chattels, and credits of the deceased and preserve the same for the executor or administrator afterwards appointed and for that purpose may commence and maintain actions as an administrator and may sell perishable and other personal estate as the Probate Division of the Superior Court orders sold and may allow or deny claims against the estate as otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 52;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 964.
Liability for debts.

A special administrator shall not be liable to an action by a creditor or to pay any debts of the deceased. With the consent of the Probate Division of the Superior Court, he or she may pay the expenses of the last sickness and the funeral expenses of the deceased and any bills against the estate of the deceased of his or her own contracting.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 965.
Bond.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her trust, a special administrator shall give a bond as the court directs, conditioned that he or she will make and return a true inventory of the goods, chattels, rights, credits, and effects of the deceased that come to his or her possession or knowledge, and that he or she will truly account for such as are received by him or her, when required by the Probate Division of the Superior Court, and will deliver the same to the person afterwards appointed executor or administrator or to a person authorized to receive the same.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 966.
Powers to cease, when.

Upon granting letters testamentary or of administration on the estate of the deceased, the powers of the special administrator shall cease. He or she shall forthwith deliver to the executor or administrator the goods, chattels, monies, and effects of the deceased in his or her hands, and the executor or administrator may prosecute to final judgment actions commenced by the special administrator.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.